dictsource/sm_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Samoan
// Author: Andy Vladescu <andyvladescu770@gmail.com>, 2025

.replace
 ‘        '

.group a
   a      a       // ipa a

.group ā
   ā      a:      // ipa aː

.group e
   e      E       // ipa ɛ

.group ē
   ē      e:      // ipa eː

.group i
   i      I       // ipa ɪ

.group ī
   ī      i:      // ipa iː

.group o
   o      o       // ipa o

.group ō
   ō      O:      // ipa ɔː

.group u
   u      U       // ipa ʊ
   u (A   w       // is pronounced [w] when followed by a vowel

.group ū
   ū      u:      // ipa uː

.group f
   f      f       // ipa f

.group g
   g      N       // ipa ŋ

.group l
   l      l       // the letter of 'l' is pronounced [ɾ]

.group m
   m      m       // ipa m

.group n
   n      n       // ipa n

.group p
   p      p       // ipa p

.group s
   s      s       // ipa s

.group t
   t      t       // ipa t

.group v
   v      v       // ipa v

.group h
   h      h       // ipa h

.group k
   k      k       // ipa k

.group r
   r      *       // ipa ɾ

.group ‘
   ‘      ?       // ipa ʔ
